Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,111
Equity securities insider trading; arbitrage transactions; exceptions.

The provisions of sections 44-3,107 to 44-3,109 shall not apply to foreign or domestic arbitrage transactions unless made in contravention of such rules and regulations as the Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate in order to carry out the purposes of sections 44-3,107 to 44-3,114.

Laws 1965, c. 248, § 5, p. 704;

Laws 1969, c. 368, § 6, p. 1309;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 109.